California statutes. Education Code
(A) Add the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.10 to the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to subdivision (d) through the 2012–13 fiscal year, and for the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to subdivision (f), for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(B) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2018–19 fiscal year, inclusive, multiply the amount computed in subparagraph (A) by the units of average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year. For the 2019–20 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, multiply the amount computed
 in subparagraph (A) by the units of average daily attendance upon which funding was based for the prior year.

(C) Add or subtract, as appropriate, the adjustment for growth or decline in enrollment, if any, computed for the special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made pursuant to Section 56836.13 from the amount computed in subparagraph (B).

(2) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2018–19 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount of funding for each special education local plan area shall be the amount computed in paragraph (1).

(3) Subject to Section 56836.045, for the 2019–20 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funding for each
 special education local plan area, which shall be the greater of either subparagraph (A) or (B):

(A) The amount of funding computed for each special education local plan area pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) An amount of funding computed as follows:

(i) Calculate the funded units of average daily attendance based on the average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made or the prior fiscal year, whichever is greater.

(ii) For the 2019–20 fiscal year, calculate the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to Section 56836.11. For the 2020–21 fiscal year and every fiscal
 year thereafter, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance shall be the amount computed pursuant to this clause for the prior fiscal year multiplied by the inflation factor for the current fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(iii) Multiply the funded units of average daily attendance computed in clause (i) by the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed in clause (ii).

(C) If the amount of funding for a special education local plan area is determined pursuant to subparagraph (B) as of the second principal apportionment for the fiscal year in which the computation is made, the special education local plan area shall be funded pursuant to subparagraph (B) for each fiscal year
 thereafter.

(c) For the 1998–99 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of General Fund moneys that the special education local plan area may claim:

(1) Add the total of the amount of property taxes for the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 2572 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made to the amount of federal funds allocated for the purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.09 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(2) Add the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to subdivision (a) for the 1998–99
 fiscal year, and commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the amount computed for the fiscal year in which the computations were made pursuant to subdivision (b) to the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56836.165).

(3) Subtract the sum computed in paragraph (1) from the sum computed in paragraph (2).

(d) For the 1998–99 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the inflation adjustment for the fiscal year in which the computation is made:

(1) For the 1998–99 fiscal year, multiply the sum of the statewide target amount
 per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the 1997–98 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.11 by the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to Section 42238.1 for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(2) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, multiply the sum of the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the prior fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 56836.11 for the prior fiscal year by the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to Section 42238.1 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(3) For purposes of computing the inflation adjustment for the special education local plan area identified as
 the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area for the 1998–99 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.10 by the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to Section 42238.1 for the fiscal year in which the computation is being made.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of General Fund moneys that the special education local plan area may claim:

(1) Determine
 the total amount of property taxes for the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 2572 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(2) Calculate the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to subdivision (b) for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(3) Subtract the amount computed in paragraph (1) from the amount computed in paragraph (2).

(f) For the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the inflation adjustment for the fiscal year in which the computation is made:

(1) Multiply the statewide target
 amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the prior fiscal year computed pursuant to Section 56836.11 by the inflation factor for the current fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(2) For purposes of computing the inflation adjustment for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the Superintendent shall multiply the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for that special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.10 by the inflation factor for the current fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 71.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.09.

For the purpose of computing the amount to apportion to each special education local plan area for the 1998–99 fiscal year, the superintendent shall compute the total amount of funding received by the special education local plan area for the 1997–98 fiscal year as follows:

(a) Add the following amounts that were received for the 1997–98 fiscal year:

(1) The total amount of federal funds apportioned to the special education local plan area pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (h) of the Schedule in Item 6110-161-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1997 for the purposes of special education for individuals with exceptional needs enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(2) The total amount of property taxes allocated to the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 2572, excluding any property taxes used to fund a program for individuals with exceptional needs younger than three years of age in the special education local plan area for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(3) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated to the special education local plan area pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700) plus the total amount received for equalization pursuant to Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 56835), as those chapters existed on December 31, 1998.

(4) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated to another special education local plan area for any pupils with exceptional needs who are served by the other special education local plan area but who are residents of the special education local plan area for which this computation is being made.

(b) Add the following amounts received in the 1997–98 fiscal year:

(1) The total amount determined for the special education local plan area for the purpose of providing nonpublic, nonsectarian school services to licensed children’s institutions, foster family homes, residential medical facilities, and other similar facilities for the 1997–98 fiscal year pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56836.16).

(2) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated for any pupils with exceptional needs who are served by the special education local plan area but who do not reside within the boundaries of the special education local plan area.

(3) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated to the special education local plan area to perform the regionalized operations and services functions listed in Article 6 (commencing with Section 56836.23) and to provide the direct instructional support of program specialists in accordance with Section 56368.

(4) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated to the special education local plan area for individuals with exceptional needs younger than three years of age pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 56700), as that chapter existed on December 31, 1998.

(5) The total amount of General Fund moneys allocated to local educational agencies within the special education local plan area pursuant to Section 56771, as that section existed on December 31, 1998, for specialized books, materials, and equipment for pupils with low-incidence disabilities.

(c) Subtract the sum computed in subdivision (b) from the sum computed in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 14.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.095.

For the 2001–02 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations in the following order:

(a) Complete the calculations required to adjust the statewide total average daily attendance pursuant to Section 56836.156, and adjust the statewide target per unit of average daily attendance for the 2001–02 fiscal year in accordance with this calculation.

(b) Compute and distribute the amount of funding appropriated for increasing the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance pursuant to Section 56836.158.

(c) Compute and provide a permanent
 adjustment for each special education local plan area pursuant to Section 56836.159.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 32, Sec. 45.   (SB 858)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.10.

(a) The Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area for the 1998–99 fiscal year:

(1) Divide the amount of funding for the special education local plan area computed for the 1997–98 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.09 by the number of units of average daily attendance, excluding average daily attendance for absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010 as that subdivision read on July 1, 1997, reported for the special education local plan area for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(2) Add the amount computed in paragraph (1) to the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 56836.08 for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(b) Commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year and continuing through the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made:

(1) For the 1999–2000 fiscal year, divide the amount of funding for the special education local plan area computed for the 1998–99 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.08 by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 56836.13 for the special education local plan area for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(2) For the 2000–01 fiscal year, to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, divide the amount of funding for the special education local plan area computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.13 for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area:

(1) From the amount of funding for the special education local plan area computed for the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08, subtract the total amount of federal funds apportioned to the special education local plan area pursuant to Schedule (1) of Item 6110-161-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2013 for purposes of special education for individuals with exceptional needs enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(2) Divide the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.13 for the special education local plan area for the 2012–13 fiscal year.

(d) For
 the 2014–15 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, divide the amount of funding for the special education local plan area computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08 by the number of units of average daily attendance upon which funding is based pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56836.13 for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year. For the 2014–15 fiscal year, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area shall include funding provided pursuant to Section 56836.12.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 72.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.11.

(a) For the purpose of computing the equalization adjustment for special education local plan areas for the 1998–99 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas:

(1) Total the amount of funding computed for each special education local plan area excluding the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, pursuant to Section 56836.09 for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(2) Total the number of units of average daily attendance reported for each special education local plan area for the 1997–98 fiscal year, excluding average daily attendance for absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010, as that section read on July 1, 1996, and excluding the units of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area.

(3) Divide the sum computed in paragraph (1) by the sum computed in paragraph (2) to determine the statewide target amount for the 1997–98 fiscal year.

(4) Add the amount computed in paragraph (3) to the
 inflation adjustment computed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 56836.08 for the 1998–99 fiscal year to determine the statewide target amount for the 1998–99 fiscal year.

(b) Commencing with the 1999–2000 fiscal year to the 2004–05 fiscal year, inclusive, to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas, the Superintendent shall multiply the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(c) For the 2005–06 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computation to determine the
 statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance to determine the inflation adjustment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 56836.13, as follows:

(1) The 2004–05 fiscal year statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance less the sum of the 2004–05 fiscal year total amount of federal funds apportioned pursuant to Schedule (1) in Item 6110-161-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2004 for purposes of special education for individuals with exceptional needs enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, divided by the total average daily attendance computed for the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the inflation factor computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.1 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(3) Add the amounts computed in
 paragraphs (1) and (2).

(d) Commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year and continuing through the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall make the following computation to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the purpose of computing the inflation adjustment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.13:

(1) The statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the inflation factor computed pursuant to subdivision (b) of
 Section 42238.1 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made.

(3) Add the amounts computed in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(e) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance to determine the inflation adjustment pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.13, as follows:

(1) Total the amount of funding computed for each special education local plan area pursuant to the amount computed in subdivision (b) of Section 56836.08, including the amount of funds appropriated pursuant to Provision 22 of Item 6110-161-0001 of Section 2.00 of the
 Budget Act of 2013, and excluding the amount of funding computed for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(2) Total the number of units of average daily attendance reported for each special education local plan area for the 2012–13 fiscal year, excluding the units of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area.

(3) Divide the sum computed in paragraph (1) by the sum computed in paragraph (2).

(f) For the 2014–15 fiscal year to the 2017–18 fiscal year, inclusive, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the purpose of computing the inflation adjustment pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.13:

(1) The statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the inflation factor computed pursuant to Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, or any successor section of law enacted by the Legislature that specifies the inflation
 factor contained in Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, for application to the 2014–15 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(3) Add the amounts computed in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(g) For the 2018–19 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the statewide target
 amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the purpose of computing the inflation adjustment pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.13:

(1) The statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section.

(2) Subtract the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 56836.24 for the 2017–18 fiscal year from the amount computed in paragraph (1).

(3) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (2) by the
 inflation factor for the 2018–19 fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(4) Add the amounts computed in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(h) Commencing with the 2019–20 fiscal year and continuing each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall make the following computations to determine the statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas for the purpose of computing the inflation adjustment pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 56836.08 and growth pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.13:

(1) The statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance computed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this section.

(2) Multiply the amount computed in paragraph (1) by the inflation factor for the current fiscal year computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(3) Add the amounts computed in paragraphs (1) and (2).

(i) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 73.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.12.

(a) For the 2013–14 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall compute an equalization adjustment for each special education local plan area, excluding the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, so that the special education funding rate per unit of average daily attendance calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.10 of a special education local plan area is not less than the special education funding rate per unit of average daily attendance calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 56836.10 that does not fall below more than 10 percent of the total statewide units of average daily
 attendance for each special education local plan area.

(b) The Superintendent shall compute an equalization adjustment for each special education local plan area’s special education funding rate per unit of average daily attendance, excluding the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, as follows:

(1) Multiply the amount computed for each special education local plan area pursuant to subdivision (a) by the average daily attendance used to calculate the special education local plan area’s special education funding for the 2013–14 fiscal year.

(2) Divide the amount appropriated
 for purposes of this section for the 2013–14 fiscal year by the statewide sum of the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(3) Multiply the amount computed for the special education local plan area pursuant to subdivision (a) by the amount computed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(c) For purposes of this section, the statewide 90th percentile special education funding rate determined pursuant to subdivision (a), and the fraction computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) for the 2012–13 second principal apportionment, shall be final, and shall not be recalculated at subsequent apportionments. The fraction computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not exceed 1.00.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 56836.145 by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 74.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.13.

(a) In order to mitigate the effects of any declining enrollment, commencing in the 1998–99 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall calculate allocations to special education local plan areas based on the average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made or the prior fiscal year, whichever is greater. However, the prior fiscal year average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area shall be adjusted for any loss or gain of average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area due to a reorganization or transfer of territory in the special education local plan area.

(b) For the 1998–99 fiscal year only, the prior year average daily attendance used in this section shall be the 1997–98 average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area, excluding average daily attendance for absences excused pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 46010, as that section read on July 1, 1996.

(c) If in the fiscal year for which the computation is made, the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area are based is greater than the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area were based in the prior fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall be allocated a growth adjustment equal to the product
 determined by multiplying the amounts determined under paragraphs (1) and (2).

(1) The statewide target amount per unit of average daily attendance for special education local plan areas determined pursuant to Section 56836.11.

(2) The difference between the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area are based for the fiscal year in which the computation is made and the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area were based for the prior fiscal year.

(d) If in the fiscal year for which the computation is made, the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special
 education local plan area are based is less than the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area were based in the prior fiscal year, the special education local plan area shall receive a funding reduction equal to the product determined by multiplying the amounts determined under paragraphs (1) and (2):

(1) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year. For the 2013–14 fiscal year only, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area for the 2013–14 fiscal year shall be used for this purpose.

(2) The difference between the number of units of average daily
 attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area are based for the fiscal year in which the computation is made and the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area were based for the prior fiscal year.

(e) If, in the fiscal year for which the computation is made, the number of units of average daily attendance upon which the allocations to the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area are based is greater than the number of units of average daily attendance upon which the allocations to that special education local plan area were based in the prior fiscal year, that special education local plan area
 shall be allocated a growth adjustment equal to the product determined by multiplying the amounts determined under paragraphs (1) and (2).

(1) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area for the prior fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.10 multiplied by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, or any successor section of law enacted by the Legislature that specifies the inflation factor contained in Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013. For the 2013–14 fiscal year only, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance computed for the special education local plan area for the 2013–14 fiscal year shall be used, and multiplied by one plus the inflation factor computed pursuant to Section
 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, or any successor section of law enacted by the Legislature that specifies the inflation factor contained in Section 42238.1, as that section read on January 1, 2013, for application to the 2013–14 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter.

(2) The difference between the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area are based for the fiscal year in which the computation is made and the number of units of average daily attendance upon which allocations to the special education local plan area were based for the prior fiscal year.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 56836.15 by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 75.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Inoperative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.2. Special Education Funding Formula [56836.14. - 56836.15.]

56836.14.

Commencing with the 2020–21 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall annually calculate the special education funding formula pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 76.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.142.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms and phrases have the following meanings:

(1) “Average daily attendance reported for a special education local plan area” means the total of the following:

(A) The total number of units of average daily attendance reported for the second principal apportionment pursuant to Section 41601 for all pupils enrolled in the district or districts that are a part of the special education local plan area.

(B) The total number of units of average daily attendance reported pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 41601 for all pupils enrolled in schools operated by the county office or
 offices that
 comprise the special education local plan area, or for those county offices that are a part of more than one special education local plan area, that portion of the average daily attendance of pupils enrolled in the schools operated by the county office that are under the jurisdiction of the special education local plan area.

(2) For purposes of computing apportionments pursuant to this chapter for the special education local plan area identified as the Los Angeles County Juvenile Court and Community School/Division of Alternative Education Special Education Local Plan Area, the term “average daily attendance” means the total number of units of average daily attendance reported for the second principal apportionment pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 41601 for all pupils enrolled in districts within the County of Los Angeles and all schools operated by the Los Angeles County Office of Education
 and the districts within the County of Los Angeles.

(3) “Special education local plan area” includes the school district or districts, county office or offices of education, and charter schools comprising the special education local plan area.

(b) (1) For purposes of this article, the inflation factor shall be the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for the State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding
 fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(2) The inflation factor shall be determined pursuant to this subdivision unless otherwise specified in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 24.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.144.

(a) For the 2020–21 and 2021–22 fiscal years, the Superintendent shall calculate allocations to special education local plan areas based on the average daily attendance reported for the special education local plan area for the fiscal year in which the computation is made, the most recent prior fiscal year, or the second most recent prior fiscal year, whichever is greatest.

(b) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall calculate special education funding allocations based on the average daily attendance reported for each local educational agency and charter school that is a local educational agency for purposes of special education accountability pursuant to Section 47641 for the fiscal year in which the computation is made, the most recent prior fiscal year, or the second most recent prior fiscal year, whichever is greatest.

(c) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, if a charter school becomes a local educational agency for purposes of special education accountability, the average daily attendance reported for the charter school in the year the computation is made, the most recent prior fiscal year, and the second most recent prior fiscal year shall be attributed to the charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 92.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

56836.146.

(a) For the 2020–21 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area, which shall be the greater of the following:

(1) Six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625) per unit of average daily attendance.

(2) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated in the 2019–20 fiscal year pursuant to Section 56836.08 for the special education local plan area.

(b) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan
 area, which shall be the greater of the following:

(1) Seven hundred fifteen dollars ($715) per unit of average daily attendance.

(2) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated in the 2020–21 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), adjusted by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142, and shall also include the inflation factor of 2.31 percent instead of zero as described in Section 56836.142 for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(c) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area, which shall be the greater of the following:

(1) Eight hundred twenty dollars ($820) per unit of average daily
 attendance.

(2) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated in the 2021–22 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(d) For the 2023–24 to 2025–26 fiscal years, inclusive, the Superintendent shall determine the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area, which shall be the greater of the following:

(1) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated for the 2022–23 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), adjusted by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142. For the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years,
 the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated for the prior fiscal year pursuant to this paragraph, adjusted each year by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142.

(2) The amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance calculated for the prior fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each special education local plan area shall be one thousand three hundred forty dollars ($1,340).

(f) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Superintendent shall calculate the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for each
 special education local plan area by adjusting the amount of funding per unit of average daily attendance for the prior fiscal year by the inflation factor described in Section 56836.142.
